Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.400

Wildlife raffle.

Any raffle authorized by the fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild turkeys shall not be subject to any provisions of this chapter other than RCW 9.46.010 and this section or to any rules or regulations of the gambling commission.

[ 1996 c 101 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—1996 c 101: See note following RCW 77.32.530.